Hawaii, session 2025, SB1511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hanalei Bay is known for its character as a quiet recreational area for families and visitors to participate in ocean activities, including surfing, swimming, paddle boarding, sailing, and kayaking.  The legislature further finds that there has been a growing increase in the number of large vessels, including yachts and ships, mooring in Hanalei Bay, posing a risk to the health and safety of individuals and families participating in ocean activities in the bay. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Preserve the quiet recreational character of Hanalei Bay; and (2)  Protect the safety of residents and visitors who use the bay for water activities; by restricting the size of vessels permitted to enter Hanalei Bay. SECTION 2.  Chapter 200, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§200- Hanalei Bay; vessel restrictions.  No vessel more than seventy-five feet in length shall enter Hanalei Bay waters, the boundary of which shall be defined by the board pursuant to chapter 91; provided that this section shall not apply to vessels operated by a federal, state, or county agency." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________